Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 3. Procedure in Civil Cases.
§ 16.1-94.
Judgment to be noted on papers; formal orders may be entered.

Whenever a judgment is rendered in a court not of record the judgment shall be entered on the warrant, motion for judgment, counterclaim, cross-claim or other pleading and signed by the judge, or the signature of the judge may be affixed by a facsimile stamp, in which event the judge shall initial a notation of the judgment made on the warrant or other paper. If the action is on a note, bond or other written obligation, the date and amount of the judgment rendered shall be noted thereon, to which notation the judge or clerk shall affix his name or his initials. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the judge from entering a formal order in any case in which he deems such order to be appropriate, including but not limited to settlement and installment orders endorsed by counsel, or to affect the validity of any formal order so entered. If such action is on a lease for the recovery of rent or possession of property this section shall not operate to require marking of such lease unless the judge deems such marking necessary.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1962, c. 361; 2004, c. 341.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2004, c. 341, cl. 2 provides: “That this act is declarative of existing law.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 341 inserted “including but not limited to settlement and installment orders endorsed by counsel” in the third sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on pleading and practice for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1973).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

11A M.J. Judgments and Decrees, § 35.

§ 16.1-94.01.
When and how satisfaction entered on judgment.

When satisfaction of any judgment rendered in a court not of record is made, the judgment creditor shall by himself, or his agent or attorney, give written notice of such satisfaction, within 30 days of receipt, to the clerk of the court in which the judgment was rendered. Such notice shall include the docket number, the names of the parties, and the date of the judgment. The clerk of the court shall then mark the judgment satisfied. For any money judgment marked as satisfied pursuant to this section, nothing herein shall satisfy an unexecuted order of possession entered pursuant to §

8.01-126

.

If the judgment creditor fails to comply with subsection A, the judgment debtor, his heirs or personal representatives, may, on motion, after 10 days’ notice thereof to the judgment creditor, or his assignee, his personal representative, or his agent or attorney, apply to the court in which the judgment was rendered to have the judgment marked satisfied. Upon proof that the judgment has been satisfied, the clerk shall mark the judgment satisfied. If the judgment creditor or his legal representatives cannot be reasonably located, the notice may be published and posted as an order of publication is required to be published and posted under §§

8.01-316

and

8.01-317

.

The cost of such proceedings, including reasonable attorney fees and the cost of publication, may be ordered to be paid by the judgment creditor.

History.

1999, c. 370; 2015, c. 547; 2017, c. 481.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 547, in subsection A,
deleted “payment or” preceding “satisfaction” twice in the first sentence and once in the third sentence, and added the last sentence; deleted “paid, discharged or otherwise” preceding “satisfied” in subsection B; substituted “attorney” for “attorney’s” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 481 substituted “and the date of the judgment” for “the date and amount of the judgment, and the date of the satisfaction” in subsection A.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Order of remittance does not serve as a satisfaction of judgment pursuant to the statute. —

An order of remittance, after the forfeiture of a bond in a general district court criminal matter has led to a docketed judgment, does not serve as a satisfaction of the judgment pursuant to the statute, but does operate as a satisfaction of the judgment docketed in the circuit court. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joel C. Cunningham, Judge, General District Court of Halifax County, 02-040 (5/29/02).

§ 16.1-94.1.
Limitations on enforcement of district court judgments.

For judgments entered in a general district court on or after January 1, 1985, no execution shall be issued or action brought on such judgment, including a judgment in favor of the Commonwealth, after ten years from the date of such judgment except as provided in §

16.1-69.55

B 4.

History.

1983, c. 499.

Law Review.

For article reviewing recent developments and changes in legislation, case law, and Virginia Supreme Court Rules affecting civil litigation, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 95 (2005).

§ 16.1-95.
Abstract of judgment.

At any time while the papers in any case in which a judgment has been rendered by a general district court are retained by the court, the judge or clerk of the court shall certify and deliver an abstract of the judgment to any person interested therein. In the absence of any such judge or clerk, or in the event of a vacancy in the office of such judge or clerk, such abstract of judgment may be made and certified by the substitute judge or clerk, if there be one, or by any other judge of a general district court in such county or city.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1983, c. 499.

§ 16.1-96.
What abstract to contain.

An abstract of a judgment rendered in a court not of record shall contain the information required by §

8.01-449

for entry in the judgment dockets of courts of record, except that it shall not be necessary to include any information as to executions which have been issued thereon.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-97.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 98.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to when a new trial is granted, see now §

16.1-97.1

.

§ 16.1-97.1.
When a new trial is granted.

No new trial may be granted from any judgment in a district court unless a motion by one of the parties is made within thirty days after the date of judgment, not including the date of entry of such judgment. The motion for new trial shall be heard by the judge who rendered the judgment, but if the judge is not in office, is absent from the jurisdiction, or is otherwise unavailable to hear the motion for new trial, such motion may be heard by a judge of that district court.

A hearing shall be held by the court, as provided herein, and the court shall rule on any such motions not later than forty-five days after the date of judgment, not including the date of entry of such judgment. Nothing contained in this section shall operate to alter the granting of a new trial by the court pursuant to §

8.01-428

, or to alter the requirements for appeal from any judgment of any district court as otherwise provided by law.

History.

1987, c. 98; 1988, c. 506.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. New Trials, §§ 3, 49.

§ 16.1-98.
Fieri facias or writ of possession on judgment.

Upon a judgment being rendered in a general district court a writ of fieri facias or a writ of possession shall be issued thereon only upon request of the judgment creditor, his assignee or his attorney. When the judgment is for personal property and the defendant is not given the option under §

8.01-121

to pay the amount of the judgment or surrender the property, the plaintiff may, at his option, have a writ of possession for the specific property and a writ of fieri facias for the damages or profits and costs, and if the writ of possession prove ineffectual he may have a writ of fieri facias for the alternate value. The judge or clerk shall write or stamp upon the docket of the court, or upon the original warrant or motion, the issuing of each such writ and the date of issuance.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1968, c. 260; 1974, c. 666; 1977, c. 624; 1983, c. 499.

Cross references.

As to writs of possession generally, see §§

8.01-470

and

8.01-471

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Courts, § 28; 8A M.J. Executions, § 2.

§ 16.1-99.
When and where executions returnable; to whom directed.

A writ of fieri facias or a writ of possession issued from a general district court shall be made returnable within 90 days to the court from which it was issued, except that a writ of fieri facias issued in the instance of a wage garnishment shall be returnable not more than 180 days after the date of issuance. If, after the return day of the writ and the completion of any garnishment, interrogatory or other proceeding in connection therewith, the papers in the case have been returned to a circuit court, then the writ and other papers in connection with such proceeding shall likewise be returned to the circuit court and filed with the papers in the case. A writ of fieri facias may be directed to the sheriff of any county or to the sergeant or constable of any corporation.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1979, c. 45; 2003, c. 234.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 234, in the first sentence, substituted “90” for “ninety,” and inserted “except that a writ of fieri facias issued in the instance of a wage garnishment shall be returnable not more than 180 days after the date of issuance” at the end.

§ 16.1-100.
Additional executions; by whom issued.

Subject to the limitations prescribed in Chapter 17 (§

8.01-426

et seq.) of Title 8.01, additional executions may be issued as provided in §

8.01-475

. Such executions shall be issued by the judge or clerk of the general district court and shall be returned to the court in which such papers are held on the return day of the execution.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1983, c. 499.

§ 16.1-101.
Proceedings against officer failing to make or making improper return.

If an officer fail to make due return of any execution issued from a court not of record, he may, on motion of the plaintiff and after ten days’ notice, be fined from time to time by the judge of such court in an amount not less than five nor more than twenty dollars for each offense. And if an officer make such return upon an execution issued from a court not of record as would, on a motion against the officer, authorize judgment to be entered against him for all or any part of the amount of such execution if the execution had issued from a court of record, the creditor on whose behalf such execution issued, or his personal representative, may, on a motion before the judge of such court after like notice obtain such judgment against the officer, his sureties and others as could be given by a court of record if the execution had issued therefrom. Section

16.1-106

with respect to appeals in civil actions shall apply to such judgment. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section any such officer may be proceeded against as provided in Chapter 16 (§

15.2-1600

et seq.) of Title 15.2, or a motion for judgment may be brought as authorized in §

8.01-227

.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-102.
Officers and sureties liable for money collected after return day.

If, after the return day of an execution issued on a judgment rendered by a court not of record, an officer shall collect money or take possession of property under such execution, he and his sureties shall be liable for such money or property in like manner as if it had been collected or taken before the return day.

History.

1956, c. 555.

§ 16.1-103.
Proceedings by interrogatories.

Whenever a fieri facias has been issued upon a judgment rendered in a general district court the judge or clerk of the court may issue the summons provided for in §

8.01-506

. In such case the judge of the general district court shall have all of the powers and authority respecting interrogatories conferred by §§

8.01-506

to

8.01-510

upon any court or judge mentioned therein. The commissioner before whom any person is required to appear by such summons shall have the same powers and authority as if such summons had been issued under § 8.01-506. All interrogatories, answers, reports and other proceedings under such summons, and also all money, evidences of indebtedness and other security in the hands of an officer which are directed by any section of Chapter 18 (§

8.01-466

et seq.) of Title 8.01 to be returned or delivered to such court or judge, or to the clerk’s office of such court, shall, when the summons was issued by a judge of a general district court be returned or delivered in like manner to the court from which the summons issued.

From any order of the judge of the general district court which involves the disposition of any money or property exceeding the sum of fifty dollars in value, exclusive of interest, there shall be an appeal in the same manner and upon the same conditions as in appeals from judgments rendered in civil matters in general district courts.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1978, c. 66; 1983, c. 499.

§ 16.1-104.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 499.

Cross references.

For current provision as to limitations on enforcement of judgments in general district court cases, and extensions thereof, see §

16.1-69.55

.

§ 16.1-105.
Attachments.

The proceedings on any attachment brought in a court not of record shall conform to the provisions of Chapter 20 (§

8.01-533

et seq.) of Title 8.01, but if an attachment is returned executed and the defendant has not been served with a copy thereof, and the amount claimed in the attachment does not exceed $500, exclusive of interest and any attorney’s fees contracted for in the instrument, the judge or clerk of the court, upon affidavit in conformity with §§

8.01-316

and

8.01-317

, shall forthwith cause a copy of the attachment to be posted at the front door of the courthouse of the county or the front door of the courtroom of the city or town wherein the attachment was issued, and shall file a certificate of the fact with the papers in the case, and, in addition to such posting, the plaintiff in the attachment or his attorney shall give to the judge or his clerk the last known address or place of abode of the defendant, verified by affidavit, and the judge or clerk shall forthwith mail a copy of the attachment to the defendant at his last known address or place of abode, or if the defendant be a corporation, at its last known address. The mailing of the copy as herein required shall be certified by the judge or clerk in writing, and such certification shall be filed with the papers in the case. Fifteen days after the copy of the attachment has been posted and a copy thereof mailed as herein required, the court may hear and decide the attachment. If the amount claimed in the attachment is more than $500, exclusive of interest and any attorney’s fees contracted for in the instrument, an order of publication shall be entered and published and other proceedings had in accordance with the provisions of §§

8.01-316

,

8.01-317

,

8.01-318

, and

8.01-320

. Personal service on a nonresident defendant out of this Commonwealth as provided in §

8.01-320

shall have the same effect, and no other, as an order of publication duly executed or the posting and mailing of a copy of the attachment as provided herein.

If any such attachment is levied on real estate, the court shall not take cognizance of the case, but the same shall be forthwith removed to a court of record having jurisdiction of other actions removed therefrom, to be further proceeded with in such court of record as if the attachment had originated therein.

History.

1956, c. 555; 2010, c. 343.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 343 substituted “$500” for “$300” in the first and fourth sentences of the first paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 2, 24, 48.

§ 16.1-106.
Appeals from courts not of record in civil cases.

From any order entered or judgment rendered in a court not of record in a civil case in which the matter in controversy is of greater value than $20, exclusive of interest, any attorney fees contracted for in the instrument, and costs, or when the case involves the constitutionality or validity of a statute of the Commonwealth, or of an ordinance or bylaw of a municipal corporation, or of the enforcement of rights and privileges conferred by the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), or of a protective order pursuant to §

19.2-152.10

, or of an action filed by a condominium unit owners’ association or unit owner pursuant to §

55.1-1959

, or of an action filed by a property owners’ association or lot owner pursuant to §

55.1-1819

, or from any order entered or judgment rendered in a general district court that alters, amends, overturns, or vacates any prior final order, there shall be an appeal of right, if taken within 10 days after such order or judgment, to a court of record. Such appeal shall be to a court of record having jurisdiction within the territory of the court from which the appeal is taken and shall be heard de novo.

If any party timely notices an appeal as provided by subsection A, such notice of appeal shall be deemed a timely notice of appeal by any other party on a final order or judgment entered in the same or a related action arising from the same conduct, transaction, or occurrence as the underlying action; however, all parties will be required to timely perfect their own respective appeals by giving a bond and the writ tax and costs, if any, in accordance with §

16.1-107

.If an appeal is noted and perfected after the sheriff has served the notice of intent to execute a writ of eviction, which is required to be served at least 72 hours before such eviction in accordance with law, the party noting or noting and perfecting such appeal shall notify the sheriff of such appeal.

The court from which an appeal is sought may refuse to suspend the execution of a judgment that refuses, grants, modifies, or dissolves an injunction in a case brought pursuant to §

2.2-3713

of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act. A protective order issued pursuant to §

19.2-152.10

, including a protective order required by §

18.2-60.4

, shall remain in effect upon petition for or the pendency of an appeal or writ of error unless ordered suspended by the judge of a circuit court or so directed in a writ of supersedeas by the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 624; 1990, c. 217; 1997, c. 831; 2009, c. 729; 2013, cc. 73, 97; 2014, c. 784; 2015, c. 714; 2020, cc. 1048, 1049.

Cross references.

As to appeals in criminal cases, see §

16.1-132

et seq.

As to appeal from judgment in actions for unlawful entry and detainer, see §

8.01-129

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2009, c. 729, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-1959” for “55-79.80:2” and “55.1-1819” for “55-513.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 729 added “and shall be heard de novo” at the end of the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 73 and 97 are identical, and inserted “including a protective order required by §

18.2-60.4

” in the second sentence of the second paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 784 in the first paragraph inserted “or of an action filed by a condominium unit owners’ association or unit owner pursuant to § 55-79.80:2, or of an action filed by a property owners’ association or lot owner pursuant to § 55-513” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 714 substituted “$20” for “$50” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1048 and 1049 are identical, and designated the existing text as subsections A and C; in subsection A, inserted “or from any order entered or judgment rendered in a general district court that alters, amends, overturns, or vacates any prior final order”; and inserted subsection B.

Law Review.

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For an article, “Final and Interlocutory Appeals in Virginia,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 337 (1999).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 269 (2009).

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 232, 356-360, 362, 363; 2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 24.

§ 16.1-106.1.
Withdrawal of appeal in civil cases.

A party who has appealed a final judgment or order rendered by a general district court or a juvenile and domestic relations district court in a civil case may seek to withdraw that appeal at any time.

If the appeal has not been perfected by posting a required appeal bond or paying required costs, or within 10 days after entry of the judgment or order when no appeal bond or costs are required to perfect the appeal, the appeal may be withdrawn by filing in the district court that entered the judgment or order and serving, in person or by first-class mail, on all parties or their counsel a written notice of intent to withdraw the appeal. When the appeal is withdrawn in the district court, the judgment or order of the district court shall have the same effect as if no appeal had been noted.

After the appeal is perfected by posting a required appeal bond or paying required costs, or after 10 days have elapsed since the entry of the judgment or order when no appeal bond or costs are required to perfect the appeal, an appealing party may request that the appeal be withdrawn by filing in the circuit court and serving, in person or by first-class mail, on all parties or their counsel a written notice of intent to withdraw the appeal.

Upon receipt of a notice of intent to withdraw an appeal filed in the circuit court, any party to the appeal, or the circuit court on its own motion, may give notice of a hearing, which shall be scheduled no later than the date set by the circuit court for trial of the appeal. Unless the hearing is scheduled at the time previously set for trial of the appeal, notice of the hearing shall be given, in person or by first-class mail, to all parties or their counsel, any non-party who has posted an appeal bond, and, when appropriate, the Department of Social Services, Division of Child Support Enforcement.

At the hearing, the circuit court shall determine whether any party objects to the proposed withdrawal. A party may object to the withdrawal of an appeal by filing in the circuit court and serving, in person or by first-class mail, on all parties or their counsel a written notice of objection to withdrawal of the appeal. If such a written objection is filed and served within a reasonable period after service of the notice of intent to withdraw the appeal, upon a showing of good cause by the party objecting to the withdrawal of the appeal, the circuit court may decline to permit the withdrawal of the appeal. If no such written objection is timely filed, the appeal shall be deemed to be withdrawn and, subject to subsections E and F, the circuit court shall enter an order disposing of the case in accordance with the judgment or order entered in the district court.

If a party who has appealed a judgment or order of a district court fails to appear in circuit court either at the time for setting the appeal for trial or on the trial date, the circuit court may, upon the motion of any party, enter an order treating the appeal as withdrawn and disposing of the case in accordance with this section. If no party appears for trial, the court may deem the appeal to be withdrawn without a motion and enter an order disposing of the case in accordance with this section.

Upon the withdrawal of an appeal from a general district court, the circuit court shall, upon request of a party who did not appeal the judgment or order, determine whether, as a result of the appeal, a party has a right to additional relief in the circuit court which has accrued since the appeal was noted, including but not limited to attorneys’ fees provided for by contract or statute. Subject to any rights of a surety pursuant to §

16.1-110

, the circuit court shall also order its clerk to disburse any cash bond posted to perfect the appeal as follows:

First, to the clerk of the court to cover taxable costs in the circuit court as provided by statute;

Second, to the prevailing party in an amount sufficient to satisfy any judgment or order entered in the general district court and any additional relief granted by the circuit court; and

Third, the balance, if any, to the person who posted the bond in the general district court.In addition, the circuit court shall enter such order as may be appropriate to conclude all matters arising out of the appeal from the general district court.

Upon the withdrawal of an appeal from a juvenile and domestic relations district court, the circuit court shall, upon request of a party who did not appeal the judgment or order, determine whether, as a result of the appeal, a party has a right to additional relief in the circuit court which has accrued since the appeal was noted, including but not limited to attorneys’ fees provided for by contract or statute. Subject to any rights of a surety pursuant to §

16.1-110

, the circuit court shall also order its clerk to disburse any cash bond posted to perfect the appeal as follows:

First, to the clerk of the court to cover taxable costs in the circuit court as provided by statute;

Second, to the prevailing party in an amount sufficient to satisfy any judgment or order entered in the juvenile and domestic relations district court and any additional relief granted by the circuit court; and

Third, the balance, if any, to the person who posted the bond in the juvenile and domestic relations district court.In addition, the circuit court shall enter such order as may be appropriate to conclude all matters arising out of the petition or motion filed in the juvenile and domestic relations district court and the appeal in circuit court, consistent with the judgment or order entered in the juvenile and domestic relations district court, as modified by the grant of any additional relief by the circuit court pursuant to this subsection. Unless the circuit court orders that the case remain in the circuit court, the case shall be remanded to the juvenile and domestic relations district court for purposes of enforcement and future modification and shall be subject to all the requirements of §

16.1-297

.

History.

2008, c. 706.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal & Error, § 232.

§ 16.1-107.
Requirements for appeal.

No appeal shall be allowed unless and until the party applying for the same or someone for him shall give bond, in an amount and with sufficient surety approved by the judge or by his clerk if there is one, or in an amount sufficient to satisfy the judgment of the court in which it was rendered. Either such amount shall include the award of attorney fees, if any. Such bond shall be posted within 30 days from the date of judgment, except for an appeal from the judgment of a general district court on an unlawful detainer pursuant to §

8.01-129

. However, no appeal bond shall be required of a plaintiff in a civil case where the defendant has not asserted a counterclaim, the Commonwealth or when an appeal is proper to protect the estate of a decedent, an infant, a convict, or an insane person, or the interest of a county, city, town or transportation district created pursuant to the Transportation District Act of 1964 (§

33.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 33.2. In a case where a defendant with indemnity coverage through a policy of liability insurance appeals, the bond required by this section shall not exceed the amount of the judgment that is covered by a policy of indemnity coverage.

In all civil cases, except trespass, ejectment, unlawful detainer against a former owner based upon a foreclosure against that owner, or any action involving the recovering rents, no indigent person shall be required to post an appeal bond. In cases of unlawful detainer against a former owner based upon a foreclosure against that owner, a person who has been determined to be indigent pursuant to the guidelines set forth in §

19.2-159

shall post an appeal bond within 30 days from the date of judgment.

In cases of unlawful detainer for a residential dwelling unit, notwithstanding the provisions of §

8.01-129

, an appeal bond shall be posted by the defendant with payment into the general district court in the amount of outstanding rent, late charges, attorney fees, and any other charges or damages due, as contracted for in the rental agreement, and as amended on the unlawful detainer by the court. If such amount is not so paid, any such appeal shall not be perfected as a matter of law. Upon perfection of an appeal, the defendant shall pay the rental amount as contracted for in the rental agreement to the plaintiff on or before the fifth day of each month. If any such rental payment is not so paid, upon written motion of the plaintiff with a copy of such written motion mailed by regular mail to the tenant, the judge of the circuit court shall, without hearing, enter judgment for the amount of outstanding rent, late charges, attorney fees, and any other charges or damages due as of that date, subtracting any payments made by such tenant as reflected in the court accounts and on a written affidavit submitted by the plaintiff, plaintiff’s managing agent, or plaintiff’s attorney with a copy of such affidavit mailed by regular mail to the tenant, and an order of possession without further hearings or proceedings in such court. Any funds held in a court account shall be released to the plaintiff without further hearing or proceeding of the court unless the defendant has filed a motion to retain some or all of such funds and the court, after a hearing, enters an order finding that the defendant is likely to succeed on the merits of a counterclaim alleging money damages against the plaintiff, in which case funds shall be held by order of such court.

If such bond is furnished by or on behalf of any party against whom judgment has been rendered for money or property or both, the bond shall be conditioned for the performance and satisfaction of such judgment or order as may be entered against such party on appeal, and for the payment of all costs and damages which may be awarded against him in the appellate court. If the appeal is by a party against whom there is no recovery except for costs, the bond shall be conditioned for the payment of such costs and damages as may be awarded against him on the appeal.

In addition to the foregoing, any party applying for appeal shall, within 30 days from the date of the judgment, pay to the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken the amount of the writ tax of the court to which the appeal is taken and costs as required by subdivision A 13 of §

17.1-275

, including all fees for service of process of the notice of appeal in the circuit court pursuant to §

16.1-112

.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 585; 1978, c. 501; 1992, c. 565; 1993, c. 970; 1998, c. 266; 2004, c. 366; 2006, c. 116; 2007, c. 869; 2008, c. 706; 2010, c. 267; 2011, c. 58; 2017, c. 657; 2019, c. 785; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 199.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 970, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 3 and Acts 1996, c. 616, cls. 3 and 5, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 970, cl. 1, “shall expire on May 31, 1998; provided, however, that the provisions of this act shall apply on and after June 1, 1998, only to any final order which disposes of a proceeding in a support case, when such proceeding was commenced in a juvenile and domestic relations district court prior to June 1, 1998, and when such case is appealed to the circuit court, regardless of whether such proceeding was commenced by a petition, motion or other pleading.”

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cls. 3 and 5, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph, in the last sentence, deleted “or” following “interest of a county, city” and added “or transportation district created pursuant to Chapter 45 (§

15.2-4500

et seq.) of Title 15.2.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 366, in the last paragraph, substituted “30” for “thirty” and added the language beginning “including all fees” at the end.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 116 inserted “a plaintiff in a civil case where the defendant has not asserted a counterclaim” in the second sentence of the first paragraph; and substituted “any party” for “the party” in the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 869 inserted the present second and last sentences in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 706 inserted “or if withdrawn pursuant to §

16.1-106.1

” near the end of the first sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 267, in the first paragraph, inserted “unlawful detainer against a former owner based upon a foreclosure against that owner” in the next-to-last sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 58, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “or in an amount sufficient” for “to abide by such judgment as may be rendered on appeal if such appeal is perfected, or if not so perfected or if withdrawn pursuant to §

16.1-106.1

, then” and added the second and third sentences.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 657 inserted the second sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 785 added the designations for subsections A and B; inserted subsection C; and added the designations for subsections D and E.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 199, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted the last sentence for the former last two sentences, which read: “No appeal bond shall be required of a defendant with indemnity coverage through a policy of liability insurance sufficient to satisfy the judgment if the defendant’s insurer provides a written irrevocable confirmation of coverage in the amount of the judgment. If defendant’s insurer does not provide a written irrevocable confirmation of coverage in the amount of the judgment then an appeal bond will be required.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1501 (1978).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2010).

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 9 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 232, 356, 360; 5A M.J. Costs, § 8.

§ 16.1-108.
Deposit of money in lieu of bond.

In lieu of giving bond with surety as provided in this article, any party appealing from the judgment or order of the court may deposit with the judge or clerk thereof, who shall issue his official receipt therefor, such sum of money as the judge or clerk may estimate to be sufficient to discharge any judgment or order which may be entered by the court of record on the trial of the appeal to secure the appeal bond. The money so deposited shall be transmitted in cash, by check of the court, surety bond, or bank check, or by draft from the escrow account of the appealing party’s attorney to the clerk of the court to which the appeal is taken, who shall likewise issue his official receipt therefor.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1975, c. 227; 1988, c. 698; 2007, c. 131.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 131, in the last sentence, inserted “surety bond, or bank check, or by draft from the escrow account of the appealing party’s attorney” and made a related change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 360.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Appeal bond of $0.00. —

Lender’s motion to dismiss was denied because the lienor satisfied the statutory requirements and purpose of an appeal bond where, while the trial court found for the lender on a lienor’s counterclaim, no money judgment was entered against the lienor in favor of the lender, there were no financial interests of the lender to protect during the appeal, and the lienor paid the appeal costs. FedStar Fed. Credit Union v. Euro-Specialty, Inc., 91 Va. Cir. 262, 2015 Va. Cir. LEXIS 136 (Roanoke Oct. 8, 2015).